District of Columbia statutes.
2-302.01

Repealed

Policy.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 201, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(f), 44 DCR 1423
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1182.1.
Delegation of Authority to the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development—Contracting and Procurement Authority, see Mayor’s Order 2009-88, June 1, 2009 ( 56 DCR 6830).